Massachusetts, session 194th, H5228.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 13 of chapter 4 of the General
Laws, wherever the town of Uxbridge or the Uxbridge Public Schools, or their subdivisions,
committees, boards, commissions, departments or offices, are required by a general or special
law, charter, by-law or judicial order to publish a legal notice in a newspaper or newspaper of
general circulation, such requirement may be met through a town-wide website that may be
maintained as a repository for such notices and 1 or more of the following means:
(i) a print newspaper of local or general circulation;
(ii) newspaper's website;
(iii) websites reporting local news and opinion which satisfy all criteria for digital
publication as set forth in said subsection (b) of said section 13 of said chapter 4; or
(iv) a statewide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices.
of 2

SECTION 2. Nothing set forth in this act shall be construed to alter or amend the time or
timing of publication of legal notices set forth in the General Laws.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2